Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2106.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 40-8 of the General Laws entitled "Medical Assistance" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
40-8-33. Community medical services.
(a) The executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall adopt and implement
a methodology for medical assistance reimbursement for services provided by licensed medical
service providers acting in their capacity as community medical service providers, to include
physicians, nurses, physician assistants, paramedics, and emergency medical technicians when
services are provided in accordance with this section to eligible recipients pursuant to the provisions
of § 40-8-3.
(b) An eligible recipient shall be qualified for coverage pursuant to this section, if as an
individual they have received hospital emergency department services three (3) or more times in a
period of four (4) consecutive months in the past twelve (12) months or have been identified by the
individual's primary health care provider for whom community medical services, as provided in
subsection (c) of this section, would likely prevent admission to or would allow discharge from a
nursing facility; or would likely prevent readmission to a hospital or nursing facility.
(c) Payment for services provided by a community medical service provider pursuant to
this section shall be a part of a care plan ordered by a primary health care provider and shall be
billed by an eligible provider enrolled in medical assistance that employs or contracts with the
community medical service provider. The care plan shall ensure that the services provided by a

community medical service provider are coordinated with other community health providers and
local public health agencies, and that the community medical services do not duplicate services
already provided to the patient, including existing home health care or waiver services. Community
medical services shall include health assessment, chronic disease monitoring and education,
medication compliance, immunizations and vaccinations, laboratory specimen collection, hospital
discharge follow-up care, and minor medical procedures approved by the director of the department
of health.
(d) Services provided by a community medical service provider to an eligible recipient who
is also receiving care coordination services shall be in consultation with the providers of the
recipient's care coordination services.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize any medical service provider to
provide services beyond or outside the scope of their training or license authorization.
(f) The director of the department of health may promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the method and manner of health care services to be provided pursuant to the provisions
of this section.
(g) The department of human services or EOHHS shall seek federal approval to implement
the provision of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003345
========
LC003345 - Page 2 of 3